Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2666.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 5 TLSB 5537HV (3) 91 ss/ko H.F. 2666 Section 1. Section 89.9, Code 2026, is amended to read as 1 follows: 2 89.9 Disposal of fees. 3 All fees provided for in this chapter shall be collected 4 by the director and remitted to the treasurer of state, to 5 be deposited in the licensing and regulation fund created in 6 section 10A.507 , together with an itemized statement showing 7 the source of collection. 8 Sec. 2. Section 89.14, subsections 4 and 8, Code 2026, are 9 amended to read as follows: 10 4. The members of the board shall select a chairperson, vice 11 chairperson, and secretary from their membership. However, 12 neither the director nor the directorâs designee shall serve 13 as chairperson. The board shall meet at least quarterly but 14 may meet as often as necessary. Meetings shall be set by a 15 majority of the board or upon the call of the chairperson, 16 or in the chairpersonâs absence, upon the call of the vice 17 chairperson. A majority of the board members who are currently 18 serving shall constitute a quorum. 19 8. The board department shall establish fees for 20 examinations, inspections, annual statements, shop inspections, 21 and other services. The fees shall reflect the actual costs 22 and expenses necessary to operate the board and perform the 23 duties of the director. 24 Sec. 3. Section 89A.3, subsection 2, paragraph i, Code 2026, 25 is amended by striking the paragraph. 26 Sec. 4. Section 89A.13, subsection 4, Code 2026, is amended 27 to read as follows: 28 4. The members of the safety board shall select a 29 chairperson, vice chairperson, and a secretary from their 30 membership. However, neither the director nor the directorâs 31 designee shall serve as chairperson. The safety board shall 32 meet at least quarterly but may meet as often as necessary. 33 Meetings shall be set by a majority of the safety board or upon 34 the call of the chairperson, or in the chairpersonâs absence, 35 -1- LSB 5537HV (3) 91 ss/ko 1/ 62 H.F. 2666 upon the call of the vice chairperson. A majority of the 1 safety board members who are currently serving shall constitute 2 a quorum. 3 Sec. 5. Section 89A.19, Code 2026, is amended to read as 4 follows: 5 89A.19 Fees. 6 1. The department shall set fees to be charged and collected 7 for inspections, permits, and commissions. 8 2. All fees collected by the director pursuant to this 9 chapter shall be remitted to the treasurer of state, to be 10 deposited in the licensing and regulation fund created in 11 section 10A.507 . 12 Sec. 6. Section 101A.2, subsection 2, Code 2026, is amended 13 to read as follows: 14 2. Licenses shall be issued by the director upon payment 15 of a fee of sixty dollars, valid for a period of three 16 calendar years, commencing on January 1 of the first year 17 and terminating on December 31 of the third year. However, 18 an initial license may be issued during a calendar year for 19 the number of months remaining in such calendar year and the 20 following two years, computed to the first day of the month 21 when the application for the license is approved. The license 22 fee shall be charged on a pro rata basis for the number of 23 months remaining in the period of issue. Applications for 24 renewal of licenses shall be submitted within thirty days prior 25 to the license expiration date and shall be accompanied by 26 payment of the prescribed fee. 27 Sec. 7. Section 103.1, subsection 1, Code 2026, is amended 28 to read as follows: 29 1. âApprentice electricianâ means any person who, as such 30 personâs principal occupation, is engaged in learning and 31 assisting in the installation, alteration, and repair of 32 electrical wiring, apparatus, and equipment as an employee 33 of a person licensed under this chapter , and who is licensed 34 by the board and is progressing toward completion of an 35 -2- LSB 5537HV (3) 91 ss/ko 2/ 62 H.F. 2666 apprenticeship training program registered by the Iowa office 1 of apprenticeship or the office of apprenticeship of the United 2 States department of labor. For purposes of this chapter , 3 persons who are not engaged in the installation, alteration, or 4 repair of electrical wiring, apparatus, and equipment, either 5 inside or outside buildings, shall not be considered apprentice 6 electricians. 7 Sec. 8. Section 103.5, Code 2026, is amended by striking the 8 section and inserting in lieu thereof the following: 9 103.5 Form of license. 10 A license under this chapter shall be issued in the form of 11 a certificate under the seal of the department and signed by 12 the director. 13 Sec. 9. Section 103.6, subsection 1, paragraph d, Code 2026, 14 is amended by striking the paragraph. 15 Sec. 10. Section 103.7, Code 2026, is amended to read as 16 follows: 17 103.7 Fees. 18 1. The department shall set fees to be charged and collected 19 for inspection and other services. 20 2. All licensing, examination, renewal, and inspection fees 21 under this chapter shall be deposited in the licensing and 22 regulation fund created in section 10A.507 . 23 Sec. 11. Section 103.10A, Code 2026, is amended to read as 24 follows: 25 103.10A Inactive master electrician license. 26 The board may by rule create an inactive master electrician 27 license and the department may establish a fee for such a 28 license. An applicant for an inactive master electrician 29 license shall, at a minimum, meet the requirements of this 30 chapter and requirements established by the board by rule 31 for licensure as a class A master electrician or a class 32 B master electrician. A person licensed as an inactive 33 master electrician shall not be authorized to act as a master 34 electrician, but shall be authorized to apply for a class A 35 -3- LSB 5537HV (3) 91 ss/ko 3/ 62 H.F. 2666 master electrician license or a class B master electrician 1 license at a future date subject to conditions and under 2 procedures established by the board by rule. The conditions 3 and procedures shall include but not be limited to completion 4 of the required number of contact hours of continuing education 5 courses specified in section 103.18 , and paying the applicable 6 license fee specified in section 103.19 for a class A master 7 electrician license or class B master electrician license. 8 Sec. 12. Section 103.15, subsection 1, Code 2026, is amended 9 to read as follows: 10 1. A person shall be licensed by the board and pay a 11 licensing fee to work as an apprentice electrician while 12 participating in an apprenticeship training program registered 13 by the Iowa office of apprenticeship or the office of 14 apprenticeship of the United States department of labor in 15 accordance with the standards established by that department 16 office . An apprenticeship shall be limited to six years from 17 the date of licensure, unless extended by the board upon a 18 finding that a hardship existed which prevented completion of 19 the apprenticeship program. Such licensure shall entitle the 20 licensee to act as an apprentice to an electrical contractor, 21 a class A master electrician, a class B master electrician, 22 a class A journeyman electrician, or a class B journeyman 23 electrician as provided in subsection 3 . 24 Sec. 13. Section 103.19, Code 2026, is amended to read as 25 follows: 26 103.19 Licenses ââ expiration ââ application ââ fees. 27 1. Licenses issued pursuant to this chapter shall 28 expire every three years, with the exception of licenses for 29 apprentice electricians and unclassified persons, which shall 30 expire on an annual basis. All license applications shall 31 include the applicantâs social security number, which shall 32 be maintained as a confidential record and shall be redacted 33 prior to public release of an application or other record 34 containing such social security number. The board department 35 -4- LSB 5537HV (3) 91 ss/ko 4/ 62 H.F. 2666 shall establish the fees to be payable for license issuance , 1 reactivation, reinstatement, and renewal in amounts not to 2 exceed the following: 3 a. For each year of the three-year license period for 4 issuance and renewal: 5 (1) Electrical contractor, one hundred twenty-five dollars. 6 (2) Class A master electrician, class B master electrician, 7 residential master electrician, one hundred twenty-five 8 dollars. 9 (3) Class A journeyman electrician, class B journeyman 10 electrician, residential electrician, or special electrician, 11 twenty-five dollars. 12 b. For apprentice electricians or unclassified persons, 13 twenty dollars . 14 2. The holder of an expired license may renew the license 15 for during a period of three months from the date of expiration 16 determined by the department by rule upon payment of the 17 license fee plus ten percent of the renewal fee for each month 18 or portion thereof past the expiration date a penalty as 19 determined by the department by rule . All holders of licenses 20 expired for more than three months shall apply for a new 21 license. 22 3. If the board determines that all licenses shall expire 23 on the same date every three years for licenses specified in 24 subsection 1 , paragraph âaâ , the license fees shall be prorated 25 by month. The board shall determine an individualâs license 26 fee based on the number of months that the individualâs license 27 will be in effect after being issued and prior to expiration 28 A licensee whose license has been revoked, suspended, 29 or voluntarily surrendered must apply for and receive 30 reinstatement of the license, as provided by the board by rule, 31 prior to practicing a profession licensed under this chapter . 32 Sec. 14. Section 103.23, subsection 3, Code 2026, is amended 33 to read as follows: 34 3. All new electrical installations for single-family 35 -5- LSB 5537HV (3) 91 ss/ko 5/ 62 H.F. 2666 residential applications requiring new electrical service 1 equipment . 2 Sec. 15. Section 103.25, Code 2026, is amended to read as 3 follows: 4 103.25 Request for inspection ââ fees. 5 1. At or before commencement of any installation required 6 to be inspected by the board, the licensee or property owner 7 making such installation shall submit to the department a 8 request for inspection. The board department shall prescribe 9 by rule the methods by which the request may be submitted , 10 which may include electronic submission or through a form 11 prescribed by the board that can be submitted either through 12 the mail or by a fax transmission. The board shall also 13 prescribe methods by which inspection fees can be paid, which 14 may include electronic methods of payment and the manner in 15 which fees may be paid . If the board or the department becomes 16 aware that a person has failed to file a necessary request for 17 inspection, the board shall send a written notification by 18 certified mail that the request must be filed within fourteen 19 days. Any person filing a late request for inspection shall 20 pay a delinquency fee in an amount to be determined by the 21 board department . A person who fails to file a late request 22 within fourteen days from receipt of the notification shall be 23 subject to a civil penalty to be determined by the board by 24 rule. 25 2. Notwithstanding subsection 1 , the board may by rule 26 provide for the issuance of a single permit to a licensee 27 to request multiple inspections. The permit authorizes the 28 licensee to perform new electrical installations specified in 29 the permit. The board department shall prescribe the methods 30 by which the request for multiple inspections may be submitted , 31 which may include electronic submission or through a form 32 prescribed by the board that can be submitted either through 33 the mail or by a fax transmission and the manner in which fees 34 may be paid . The board shall also prescribe methods by which 35 -6- LSB 5537HV (3) 91 ss/ko 6/ 62 H.F. 2666 inspection fees can be paid, which may include electronic 1 methods of payment. The board may perform inspections of 2 each new electrical installation or any portion of the total 3 number of new electrical installations made under each permit. 4 The board department shall establish fees for such permits, 5 which shall not exceed the total inspection fees that would be 6 required if each new electrical installation performed under 7 the request for multiple inspections had been performed under 8 individual requests for inspections as provided in subsection 9 1 . 10 Sec. 16. Section 103.31, subsection 6, Code 2026, is amended 11 to read as follows: 12 6. The board shall establish an internet-based licensure 13 verification database for access by a state or local inspector 14 for verification of licensee status. The database shall 15 include the name of every person licensed under this chapter 16 and a corresponding licensure number. However, the licenseeâs 17 home address, home telephone number, and other personal 18 information as determined by rule shall be confidential. 19 Inspectors shall be authorized to request the name and 20 license number of any person working at a job site subject to 21 inspection for verification of licensee status. Licensees 22 under this chapter shall be required to carry a copy of their 23 current license and photo identification at all times when 24 employed on a job site for compliance with this subsection . 25 Sec. 17. Section 103.32, subsection 1, Code 2026, is amended 26 to read as follows: 27 1. All state electrical inspection fees shall be due and 28 payable to the board department at or before commencement of 29 the installation and shall be forwarded with the request for 30 inspection. Inspection fees provided in this section shall 31 not apply within the jurisdiction of any political subdivision 32 if the political subdivision has adopted an ordinance or 33 resolution pursuant to this chapter . 34 Sec. 18. Section 103.32, subsection 2, unnumbered paragraph 35 -7- LSB 5537HV (3) 91 ss/ko 7/ 62 H.F. 2666 1, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 1 The board department shall establish the fees for 2 inspections in amounts not to exceed: 3 Sec. 19. Section 103.34, subsection 1, Code 2026, is amended 4 to read as follows: 5 1. Upon receipt of a notice of appeal filed pursuant to 6 section 103.33 , the chairperson of the board or administrative 7 staff of the board department may designate a hearing officer 8 from among the board members , or an administrative law judge 9 employed by the department, to hear the appeal or may set the 10 matter for hearing before the full board at its next scheduled 11 meeting. A majority of the board shall make the decision. 12 Sec. 20. Section 105.2, subsection 1, Code 2026, is amended 13 to read as follows: 14 1. âApprenticeâ means any person, other than a helper, 15 journeyperson, or master, who, as a principal occupation, is 16 engaged in working as an employee of a plumbing, mechanical, 17 HVAC-refrigeration, sheet metal, or hydronic systems contractor 18 under the supervision of either a master or a journeyperson and 19 is progressing toward completion of an apprenticeship training 20 program registered by the Iowa office of apprenticeship or the 21 office of apprenticeship of the United States department of 22 labor while learning and assisting in the design, installation, 23 and repair of plumbing, HVAC, refrigeration, sheet metal, or 24 hydronic systems, as applicable. 25 Sec. 21. Section 105.3, subsection 2, paragraph a, 26 subparagraphs (1) and (2), Code 2026, are amended by striking 27 the subparagraphs. 28 Sec. 22. Section 105.5, subsection 1, Code 2026, is amended 29 to read as follows: 30 1. Any person desiring to take an examination for a license 31 issued pursuant to this chapter shall make application to 32 the board in accordance with the rules of the board. The 33 application form shall be no longer than two pages in length, 34 plus one security page. The board may require that a recent 35 -8- LSB 5537HV (3) 91 ss/ko 8/ 62 H.F. 2666 photograph of the applicant be attached to the application. 1 Sec. 23. Section 105.9, subsections 1 and 2, Code 2026, are 2 amended to read as follows: 3 1. The board department shall set the fees for the 4 examination of all applicants , by rule , which fees shall be 5 based upon the cost of administering the examinations . 6 2. The board department shall set the license fees and 7 renewal fees for all licenses issued pursuant to this chapter , 8 by rule. 9 Sec. 24. Section 105.9, subsections 5 and 6, Code 2026, are 10 amended by striking the subsections. 11 Sec. 25. Section 105.15, Code 2026, is amended to read as 12 follows: 13 105.15 Registry of licenses. 14 The name, location, license number, and date of issuance 15 of the license of each person to whom a license has been 16 issued shall be entered in a registry kept in the office 17 of the department to be known as the plumbing, mechanical, 18 HVAC-refrigeration, sheet metal, or hydronic registry. The 19 registry may be electronic and shall be open to public 20 inspection. However, the licenseeâs home address, home 21 telephone number, and other personal information as determined 22 by rule shall be confidential. 23 Sec. 26. Section 105.16, Code 2026, is amended to read as 24 follows: 25 105.16 Change of residence. 26 If a person licensed to practice as a contractor or a 27 plumbing, mechanical, HVAC-refrigeration, sheet metal, or 28 hydronic professional under this chapter changes the personâs 29 residence or place of practice, the person shall so notify the 30 board department . 31 Sec. 27. Section 105.18, subsection 2, paragraph a, 32 subparagraph (3), Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 33 (3) Be enrolled in an applicable apprentice program which is 34 registered with the United States department of labor office of 35 -9- LSB 5537HV (3) 91 ss/ko 9/ 62 H.F. 2666 apprenticeship or the Iowa office of apprenticeship . 1 Sec. 28. Section 105.18, subsection 2, paragraph b, 2 subparagraph (1), subparagraph divisions (a) and (c), Code 3 2026, are amended to read as follows: 4 (a) File an application and pay application fees as 5 established by the board department , which application shall 6 establish that the person meets the minimum educational and 7 experience requirements adopted by the board. 8 (c) Provide the board with evidence of having completed 9 at least four years of practical experience as an apprentice. 10 Commencing January 1, 2010 2027 , the four years of practical 11 experience required by this subparagraph division must be 12 an apprenticeship training program registered by the United 13 States department of labor Iowa workforce development office 14 of apprenticeship. 15 Sec. 29. Section 105.18, subsection 2, paragraph c, 16 subparagraph (1), subparagraph division (a), Code 2026, is 17 amended to read as follows: 18 (a) File an application and pay application fees as 19 established by the board department , which application shall 20 establish that the person meets the minimum educational and 21 experience requirements adopted by the board. 22 Sec. 30. Section 105.18, subsection 2, paragraph d, 23 subparagraph (1), Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 24 (1) File an application and pay application fees as 25 established by the board department and establish that the 26 person meets the minimum requirements adopted by the board. 27 Through June 30, 2017, the application shall include the 28 personâs state contractor registration number. After July 29 1, 2017, the The application shall include proof of workers 30 compensation insurance coverage, proof of unemployment 31 insurance compliance, and, for out-of-state contractors, a bond 32 as described in chapter 91C . 33 Sec. 31. Section 105.18, subsection 3, paragraph c, Code 34 2026, is amended to read as follows: 35 -10- LSB 5537HV (3) 91 ss/ko 10/ 62 H.F. 2666 c. The board shall department may establish a special, 1 restricted license fee at a reduced rate, consistent with any 2 other special, restricted license fees. 3 Sec. 32. Section 105.20, Code 2026, is amended to read as 4 follows: 5 105.20 Renewal and reinstatement of licenses ââ fees and 6 penalties ââ continuing education. 7 1. All licenses issued under this chapter shall be issued 8 for a three-year period. 9 2. A license issued under this chapter may be renewed 10 as provided by rule adopted by the board department upon 11 application by the licensee, without examination. Applications 12 for renewal shall be made to the board department , accompanied 13 by the required renewal licensing fee, at least thirty days 14 prior to the expiration date of the license and submitted 15 during a period as determined by the department by rule . 16 3. Failure to renew a license within a reasonable time after 17 the expiration of the license shall not invalidate the license, 18 but a reasonable penalty may be assessed as adopted by rule, 19 in addition to the license renewal fee, to allow reinstatement 20 of the license A licensee may renew an inactive or lapsed 21 license by submitting a reactivation fee and completing other 22 requirements as determined by the board by rule . 23 4. The board shall, by rule, establish a reinstatement 24 process for a licensee who allows a license to lapse, including 25 reasonable penalties as determined by the department by rule . 26 5. a. The basic continuing education requirement for 27 renewal of a license shall be the completion, during the 28 immediately preceding license term, of the number of classroom 29 hours of instruction required by the board in courses or 30 seminars which have been approved by the board. The board 31 shall require at least eight classroom hours of instruction 32 during each three-year licensing term. 33 b. A licensee shall have a thirty-day grace period , as 34 determined by the department by rule, after expiration of the 35 -11- LSB 5537HV (3) 91 ss/ko 11/ 62 H.F. 2666 licensing term to complete all requirements necessary for 1 license renewal without penalty. 2 6. A licensee whose license has been revoked, suspended, 3 or voluntarily surrendered must apply for and receive 4 reinstatement of the license, as provided by the board by rule, 5 prior to practicing a profession licensed under this chapter. 6 Sec. 33. Section 147.1, subsections 3 and 6, Code 2026, are 7 amended to read as follows: 8 3. âLicensedâ or âcertifiedâ , when applied to a physician 9 and surgeon, podiatric physician, osteopathic physician and 10 surgeon, genetic counselor, physician assistant, psychologist, 11 chiropractor, nurse, dentist, dental hygienist, dental 12 assistant, optometrist, speech pathologist, audiologist, 13 pharmacist, physical therapist, physical therapist assistant, 14 occupational therapist, occupational therapy assistant, 15 orthotist, prosthetist, pedorthist, respiratory care 16 practitioner, practitioner of cosmetology arts and sciences, 17 practitioner of barbering, funeral director, dietitian, 18 behavior analyst, assistant behavior analyst, marital and 19 family therapist, mental health counselor, midwife, respiratory 20 care and polysomnography practitioner, polysomnographic 21 technologist, social worker, massage therapist, athletic 22 trainer, acupuncturist, nursing home administrator, hearing aid 23 specialist, or sign language interpreter or transliterator , 24 accountant, architect, engineer or land surveyor, real estate 25 broker, real estate salesperson, real estate appraiser, 26 landscape architect, or interior designer means a person 27 licensed under this subtitle . 28 6. âProfessionâ means medicine and surgery, podiatry, 29 osteopathic medicine and surgery, genetic counseling, practice 30 as a physician assistant, psychology, chiropractic, nursing, 31 dentistry, dental hygiene, dental assisting, optometry, speech 32 pathology, audiology, pharmacy, physical therapy, physical 33 therapist assisting, occupational therapy, occupational therapy 34 assisting, respiratory care, cosmetology arts and sciences, 35 -12- LSB 5537HV (3) 91 ss/ko 12/ 62 H.F. 2666 barbering, mortuary science, applied behavior analysis, marital 1 and family therapy, mental health counseling, midwifery, 2 polysomnography, social work, dietetics, massage therapy, 3 athletic training, acupuncture, nursing home administration, 4 practice as a hearing aid specialist, sign language 5 interpreting or transliterating, orthotics, prosthetics, or 6 pedorthics , accountancy, architecture, engineering and land 7 surveying, real estate, real estate brokerage, real estate 8 sale, real estate appraisal, landscape architecture, or 9 interior design . 10 Sec. 34. Section 147.2, Code 2026, is amended to read as 11 follows: 12 147.2 License required. 13 1. A person shall not engage in the practice of medicine 14 and surgery, podiatry, osteopathic medicine and surgery, 15 genetic counseling, psychology, chiropractic, physical 16 therapy, physical therapist assisting, nursing, dentistry, 17 dental hygiene, dental assisting, optometry, speech pathology, 18 audiology, occupational therapy, occupational therapy 19 assisting, orthotics, prosthetics, pedorthics, respiratory 20 care, pharmacy, cosmetology arts and sciences, barbering, 21 social work, dietetics, applied behavior analysis, marital 22 and family therapy or mental health counseling, massage 23 therapy, mortuary science, polysomnography, athletic training, 24 acupuncture, nursing home administration, or sign language 25 interpreting or transliterating, or shall not practice as a 26 physician assistant , or a hearing aid specialist, accountant, 27 architect, engineer or land surveyor, real estate broker, real 28 estate salesperson, real estate appraiser, landscape architect, 29 or interior designer unless the person , or entity employing the 30 person, if applicable, has obtained a license for that purpose 31 from the board for the profession or the department . 32 2. For purposes of this section , a person who is licensed 33 in another state and recognized for licensure in this state 34 pursuant to the nurse a licensure compact contained in section 35 -13- LSB 5537HV (3) 91 ss/ko 13/ 62 H.F. 2666 152E.1 or pursuant to the advanced practice registered nurse 1 compact contained in section 152E.3 which issues a multistate 2 license or authorization to practice shall be considered to 3 have obtained a license to practice nursing the profession . 4 Sec. 35. Section 147.3, Code 2026, is amended to read as 5 follows: 6 147.3 Qualifications. 7 An applicant for a license to practice a profession under 8 this subtitle is not ineligible because of age, citizenship, 9 sex, race, religion, marital status, or national origin , 10 although the application form may require citizenship 11 information . 12 Sec. 36. Section 147.5, Code 2026, is amended to read as 13 follows: 14 147.5 Certificate of license. 15 1. Every license to practice a profession shall be in 16 the form of a certificate under the seal of the board. Such 17 license shall be issued in the name of the board issued by the 18 department . 19 2. This section shall not apply to a person who is licensed 20 in another state and recognized for licensure in this state 21 pursuant to the nurse a licensure compact contained in section 22 152E.1 or pursuant to the advanced practice registered nurse 23 compact contained in section 152E.3 which issues a multistate 24 license or authorization to practice . 25 Sec. 37. Section 147.7, subsection 2, Code 2026, is amended 26 to read as follows: 27 2. This section shall not apply to a person who is licensed 28 in another state and recognized for licensure in this state 29 pursuant to the nurse a licensure compact contained in section 30 152E.1 or pursuant to the advanced practice registered nurse 31 compact contained in section 152E.3 which issues a multistate 32 license or authorization to practice . A person licensed in 33 another state and recognized for licensure in this state 34 pursuant to either a compact shall, however, maintain a copy 35 -14- LSB 5537HV (3) 91 ss/ko 14/ 62 H.F. 2666 of a license issued by the personâs home state available for 1 inspection when engaged in the practice of nursing the personâs 2 profession in this state. 3 Sec. 38. Section 147.8, subsection 2, Code 2026, is amended 4 by striking the subsection. 5 Sec. 39. Section 147.9, Code 2026, is amended to read as 6 follows: 7 147.9 Change of address. 8 Every person licensed pursuant to this chapter shall notify 9 the board which issued the license department of a change in 10 the personâs address of record within a time period established 11 by board the department by rule. 12 Sec. 40. Section 147.10, Code 2026, is amended to read as 13 follows: 14 147.10 Renewal. 15 1. Every license to practice a profession shall expire 16 in multiyear intervals and be renewed upon application of 17 the licensee as determined by the board upon application 18 by the licensee department . Each board A renewal interval 19 for a license shall not exceed five years. The department 20 shall establish rules for license renewal and concomitant 21 fees. Application for renewal shall be made to the board 22 accompanied by the required fee at least thirty days prior to 23 the expiration of such license. 24 2. Each board The department may by rule establish a grace 25 period following expiration of a license in which the license 26 is not invalidated. Each board The department may assess a 27 reasonable penalty for renewal of a license during the grace 28 period. Failure of a licensee to renew a license within the 29 grace period shall cause the license to become inactive or 30 lapsed. A licensee whose license is inactive or lapsed shall 31 not engage in the practice of the profession until the license 32 is reactivated or reinstated. 33 Sec. 41. Section 147.11, subsection 1, Code 2026, is amended 34 to read as follows: 35 -15- LSB 5537HV (3) 91 ss/ko 15/ 62 H.F. 2666 1. A licensee who allows the license to become inactive 1 or lapsed by failing to renew the license, as provided in 2 section 147.10 , may reactivate the license upon payment of a 3 reactivation fee and compliance with other terms established by 4 board the department by rule. 5 Sec. 42. NEW SECTION . 147.11A Temporary license. 6 1. A board may issue a temporary license authorizing the 7 licensee to practice in a specific location or locations and 8 for a specified period of time if, in the opinion of the board, 9 the person possesses the qualifications prescribed by the board 10 for the license, which shall be substantially equivalent to 11 those required for licensure under this chapter. The board 12 shall determine by rule eligibility requirements for the 13 license and what type of examination shall be given, if any. 14 Requirements relating to regular permanent licensure are not 15 mandatory for a temporary license, except as specifically 16 determined by the board by rule. The granting of a temporary 17 license does not indicate that the person so licensed is 18 eligible for regular licensure. 19 2. A temporary license shall be issued for a period 20 determined by the department by rule but shall not exceed 21 one year. A temporary license may be renewed, but a person 22 shall not practice for more than three years under a temporary 23 license. The department shall set the fees for issuance and 24 renewal of a temporary license by rule. 25 3. Each board may adopt rules for the implementation of this 26 section, including for revocation of a temporary license. 27 Sec. 43. NEW SECTION . 147.11B Licensure by reciprocity. 28 A board may grant licensure, registration, or certification 29 by reciprocity. Each board that grants a license, 30 registration, or certification by reciprocity shall adopt rules 31 establishing the documentation that an applicant must furnish 32 in order to establish the applicantâs eligibility. 33 Sec. 44. NEW SECTION . 147.11C Voluntary surrender of 34 license. 35 -16- LSB 5537HV (3) 91 ss/ko 16/ 62 H.F. 2666 The director of the department may accept the voluntary 1 surrender of a license if accompanied by a written statement of 2 intention. The voluntary surrender, when accepted, shall have 3 the same force and effect as an order of revocation. 4 Sec. 45. Section 147.13, Code 2026, is amended by adding the 5 following new subsections: 6 NEW SUBSECTION . 21. For architecture, the architectural 7 examining board. 8 NEW SUBSECTION . 22. For engineering and land surveying, the 9 engineering and land surveying examining board. 10 NEW SUBSECTION . 23. For real estate appraisers, the real 11 estate appraiser examining board. 12 NEW SUBSECTION . 24. For landscape architecture, and the 13 landscape architectural examining board. 14 NEW SUBSECTION . 25. For registered interior design, the 15 interior design examining board. 16 Sec. 46. Section 147.14, subsection 1, Code 2026, is amended 17 by adding the following new paragraphs: 18 NEW PARAGRAPH . t. For architecture, a total of five 19 members, four of whom are licensed to practice architecture and 20 one of whom is not a licensed architect and who represents the 21 general public. 22 NEW PARAGRAPH . u. For engineering and land surveying, 23 three members who are licensed professional engineers, two 24 members who are licensed professional land surveyors, and 25 two members who are not licensed professional engineers or 26 licensed professional land surveyors and who shall represent 27 the general public. A licensed member must be actively engaged 28 in the practice of engineering or land surveying and been so 29 engaged for five consecutive years immediately preceding the 30 appointment, the last two years of which shall have been in 31 Iowa. Insofar as practicable, licensed engineer members of 32 the board shall be from different branches of the profession 33 of engineering. 34 NEW PARAGRAPH . v. For real estate appraisers, five members, 35 -17- LSB 5537HV (3) 91 ss/ko 17/ 62 H.F. 2666 one of whom must be a public member and four of whom must be 1 certified real estate appraisers. A certified member must 2 be actively engaged in practice as a certified real estate 3 appraiser. Insofar as practicable, certified real estate 4 appraiser members should represent each class of certified 5 appraisers. 6 NEW PARAGRAPH . w. For landscape architecture, five members 7 who are professional landscape architects and two members 8 who are not professional landscape architects and who shall 9 represent the general public. Four of the five professional 10 members must be actively engaged in the practice of landscape 11 architecture or the teaching of landscape architecture in 12 an accredited college or university, and must have been so 13 engaged for five years preceding appointment, the last two of 14 which shall have been in Iowa. One of the five professional 15 members must be actively engaged in the practice of landscape 16 architecture or the teaching of landscape architecture in an 17 accredited college or university for a minimum of one year 18 immediately preceding appointment. 19 NEW PARAGRAPH . x. For interior design, a total of seven 20 members, five members who are registered interior designers and 21 who have been in the active practice of registered interior 22 design for not less than five years, the last two years of 23 which shall have been in Iowa, and two members who are not 24 registered interior designers and who shall represent the 25 general public. 26 Sec. 47. Section 147.14, subsection 2, Code 2026, is amended 27 to read as follows: 28 2. A majority of the board members of a board who are 29 currently serving constitutes a quorum. 30 Sec. 48. Section 147.25, subsection 2, Code 2026, is amended 31 to read as follows: 32 2. In addition to any other fee provided by law, a fee may 33 be set by the respective boards department for each license 34 and renewal of a license to practice a profession, which fee 35 -18- LSB 5537HV (3) 91 ss/ko 18/ 62 H.F. 2666 shall be based on the annual cost of collecting information 1 for use by the board in the administration of the system of 2 health personnel statistics established by this section . The 3 fee shall be retained by the respective board in the manner in 4 which license and renewal fees are retained in section 147.82 . 5 Sec. 49. Section 147.44, Code 2026, is amended to read as 6 follows: 7 147.44 Reciprocal agreements. 8 A board may enter into a reciprocal agreement with a 9 licensing authority of another state for the purpose of 10 recognizing licenses issued by the other state, provided 11 that such licensing authority imposes licensure requirements 12 substantially equivalent to those imposed in this state. The 13 board may establish by rule the conditions for the recognition 14 of such licenses and the department may establish by rule the 15 process for licensing such individuals to practice in this 16 state. 17 Sec. 50. NEW SECTION . 147.57 Voluntary agreements. 18 A board, after due notice and hearing, may issue an order to 19 revoke, suspend, or restrict a license to practice a licensed 20 profession, or to issue a restricted license on application if 21 the board determines that a licensee or applicant has entered 22 into a voluntary agreement to restrict the practice of the 23 licensed profession in another state, district, territory, 24 country, or agency of the federal government. A certified copy 25 of the voluntary agreement shall be considered prima facie 26 evidence. 27 Sec. 51. Section 147.73, subsection 2, Code 2026, is amended 28 to read as follows: 29 2. As prohibiting any holder of a degree conferred by an 30 institution of learning accredited by the appropriate board 31 created in this chapter , or by some a recognized state or 32 national accrediting agency, from using the title which such 33 degree authorizes the holder to use, but the holder shall not 34 use such degree or abbreviation in any manner which might 35 -19- LSB 5537HV (3) 91 ss/ko 19/ 62 H.F. 2666 mislead the public as to the holderâs qualifications to treat 1 human ailments . 2 Sec. 52. Section 147.74, Code 2026, is amended by adding the 3 following new subsections: 4 NEW SUBSECTION . 29. An architect licensed under chapter 5 544A may use the words âarchitectâ, âlicensed architectâ, or 6 âarchitectural designerâ after the personâs name. 7 NEW SUBSECTION . 30. A person licensed to engage in the 8 practice of engineering under chapter 542B may use the words 9 âprofessional engineerâ or âlicensed engineerâ after the 10 personâs name. A person licensed to engage in the practice 11 of land surveying under chapter 542B may use the words 12 âprofessional land surveyorâ or âlicensed land surveyorâ after 13 the personâs name. 14 NEW SUBSECTION . 31. A person holding a certificate to 15 engage in the practice of real estate appraisals under chapter 16 543D may use the words âcertified real estate appraiserâ after 17 the personâs name. A person holding a registration to engage 18 in the practice of real estate appraisals as an associate 19 under chapter 543D may use the words âassociate real estate 20 appraiserâ after the personâs name. 21 NEW SUBSECTION . 32. A person licensed to engage in the 22 practice of landscape architecture under chapter 544B may 23 use the words âlandscape architectâ, âprofessional landscape 24 architectâ, or âlandscape architecture designerâ after the 25 personâs name. 26 NEW SUBSECTION . 33. A person who has been issued a 27 certificate of registration under chapter 544C may use the 28 words âregistered interior designerâ or any other title or 29 device indicating that the person is a registered interior 30 designer after the personâs name. 31 Sec. 53. Section 147.76, Code 2026, is amended to read as 32 follows: 33 147.76 Rules. 34 The boards for the various professions shall adopt all 35 -20- LSB 5537HV (3) 91 ss/ko 20/ 62 H.F. 2666 necessary and proper rules to administer and interpret this 1 chapter , chapter 272C, chapters 542 through 544C, and chapters 2 148 through 157, except chapter 148D. 3 Sec. 54. Section 147.80, subsection 1, unnumbered paragraph 4 1, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 5 Each board, following approval by the The department , may, 6 or at the direction of the department, shall , by rule establish 7 or revise fees for the following: 8 Sec. 55. Section 147.80, subsection 2, Code 2026, is amended 9 to read as follows: 10 2. The department shall annually prepare estimates of 11 projected revenues to be generated by all fees collected 12 as well as a projection of the aggregate administrative 13 costs and rental expenses attributable to all boards and the 14 division of the department responsible for licensing related 15 to such boards. The department shall annually review and, if 16 necessary, direct the boards to adjust the schedule of fees to 17 cover aggregate projected expenses and ensure fees imposed in 18 this state are not greater than similar fees imposed by similar 19 boards or agencies in other states. The department shall 20 annually provide to each appropriate board a comparison of the 21 amount of the boardâs fees as compared to similar fees imposed 22 by similar boards or agencies in other states. 23 Sec. 56. Section 147.82, Code 2026, is amended to read as 24 follows: 25 147.82 Disposition of fees. 26 All fees collected by a board listed in section 147.13 or by 27 the department, and fees collected pursuant to sections 124.301 28 and 147.80 and chapter 155A by the board of pharmacy, shall 29 be deposited in the licensing and regulation fund created in 30 section 10A.507 . 31 Sec. 57. Section 147.86, Code 2026, is amended to read as 32 follows: 33 147.86 Penalties. 34 1. Any person violating any provision of this subtitle , 35 -21- LSB 5537HV (3) 91 ss/ko 21/ 62 H.F. 2666 except insofar as the provisions apply or relate to or affect 1 the practice of pharmacy, or where a specific penalty is 2 otherwise provided, shall be guilty of a serious misdemeanor. 3 2. When it appears to a board that a person has violated a 4 provision of this subtitle, the board may certify the facts to 5 the attorney general or the county attorney of the county where 6 the person maintains a business office. 7 3. If, after an investigation, a board has reason to believe 8 that a person has knowingly engaged in an act or practice that 9 constitutes a violation of this subtitle, the board may submit 10 the information to the attorney general of any state, or other 11 appropriate law enforcement official, who, in such officialâs 12 discretion, may initiate an appropriate criminal proceeding. 13 4. Evidence of the commission of a single act prohibited 14 by this subtitle, chapters 148 through 157, chapter 272C, or 15 chapters 542 through 544C is sufficient to justify a penalty, 16 injunction, restraining order, or conviction, without evidence 17 of a general course of conduct. 18 Sec. 58. Section 147.87, subsection 2, Code 2026, is amended 19 to read as follows: 20 2. The department may administratively close a complaint 21 that does not allege a violation of this chapter , the boardâs 22 enabling statute, or a rule of the board , if the complaint 23 does not allege harm to the public, or if the complaint is 24 referred to another agency or law enforcement . The board may 25 administratively terminate an investigation if the alleged 26 violation of this chapter, the boardâs enabling statute, or 27 rule of the board is not substantiated. 28 Sec. 59. Section 147.88, Code 2026, is amended to read as 29 follows: 30 147.88 Inspections and investigations. 31 1. The department may perform inspections and 32 investigations as required by this subtitle . 33 2. The department shall employ personnel pursuant to 34 chapter 8A, subchapter IV, to perform duties related to 35 -22- LSB 5537HV (3) 91 ss/ko 22/ 62 H.F. 2666 inspection and investigation functions under this subtitle. 1 The costs and expenses of inspectors and investigators shall be 2 paid from funds appropriated to the department. 3 3. The department may employ clerical assistants pursuant 4 to chapter 8A, subchapter IV, to administer and enforce this 5 subtitle. The costs and expenses of clerical assistants shall 6 be paid from funds appropriated to the department. 7 4. Investigators authorized by a board or the department 8 shall have the powers and status of peace officers when 9 enforcing this subtitle, chapters 148 through 157 except 148D, 10 chapter 272C, and chapters 542 through 544C. 11 5. If an investigation pursuant to this subtitle, chapters 12 148 through 157 except 148D, chapter 272C, or chapters 542 13 through 544C, reveals that an unlicensed person has acted in 14 the capacity of a licensed person or entity, the board or 15 department shall issue a cease and desist order, and may impose 16 a civil penalty not to exceed one thousand dollars. 17 Sec. 60. Section 147.92, Code 2026, is amended to read as 18 follows: 19 147.92 Attorney general. 20 Upon request of a board , the attorney general shall 21 institute in the name of the state the proper proceedings 22 against any person charged by the board with violating any 23 provision of this or the following chapters of this subtitle , 24 chapters 147 through 157, chapter 272C, or chapters 542 through 25 544C . 26 Sec. 61. NEW SECTION . 147.97 Administrative penalty. 27 1. A board may impose an administrative penalty of up to 28 five hundred dollars on a licensee, registrant, or trainee of 29 the board who does any of the following: 30 a. Engages in a practice regulated by this chapter without a 31 current license, permit, or qualification. 32 b. Employs a person without a current license, permit, 33 or qualification to engage in a practice regulated by this 34 chapter. 35 -23- LSB 5537HV (3) 91 ss/ko 23/ 62 H.F. 2666 c. Fails to complete the continuing education required for 1 the renewal of a license, permit, or qualification. 2 2. The imposition and payment of a penalty pursuant to 3 subsection 1 shall not be considered a disciplinary action or 4 reported as discipline and shall be confidential. 5 3. A licensee, registrant, or trainee may contest a penalty 6 imposed pursuant to subsection 1, by initiating a contested 7 case proceeding pursuant to chapter 17A. 8 4. This section does not prohibit a board from imposing 9 discipline on a licensee, registrant, or trainee for willful 10 or repeated violations. 11 5. An administrative penalty collected pursuant to this 12 section shall be deposited in the general fund of the state. 13 Sec. 62. Section 148.3, subsections 2 and 3, Code 2026, are 14 amended by striking the subsections. 15 Sec. 63. Section 148.5, Code 2026, is amended to read as 16 follows: 17 148.5 Resident physician license. 18 A physician, who is a graduate of a medical school or 19 college of osteopathic medicine and surgery and is serving as a 20 resident physician who is not otherwise licensed to practice 21 medicine and surgery or osteopathic medicine and surgery in 22 this state, shall be required to obtain from the board a 23 license to practice as a resident physician. The license shall 24 be designated âResident Physician Licenseâ and shall authorize 25 the licensee to serve as a resident physician only, under 26 the supervision of a licensed practitioner of medicine and 27 surgery or osteopathic medicine and surgery, in an institution 28 approved for such training by the board. A license shall be 29 valid for a duration as determined by the board department by 30 rule . The fee for each license shall be set by the board to 31 cover the administrative costs of issuing the license. The 32 board shall determine in each instance those eligible for a 33 license, whether or not examinations shall be given, and the 34 type of examinations. Requirements of the law pertaining 35 -24- LSB 5537HV (3) 91 ss/ko 24/ 62 H.F. 2666 to regular permanent licensure shall not be mandatory for a 1 resident physician license except as specifically designated by 2 the board. The granting of a resident physician license does 3 not in any way indicate that the person licensed is necessarily 4 eligible for regular permanent licensure, or that the board in 5 any way is obligated to license the individual. 6 Sec. 64. Section 148.11, subsection 3, Code 2026, is amended 7 to read as follows: 8 3. The board shall establish a fee for initial issuance and 9 renewal of a special license. The board shall establish rules 10 for granting and renewing a special license consistent with 11 those for permanent licenses. 12 Sec. 65. Section 148.11A, subsection 2, Code 2026, is 13 amended to read as follows: 14 2. An application for an administrative medicine license 15 shall be made to the board. An applicant for an administrative 16 medicine license shall meet all of the requirements established 17 in section 148.3 and any additional requirements established by 18 the board by rule. The board shall also adopt rules governing 19 the initial issuance and renewal of administrative medicine 20 licenses and establishing fees therefor. All license and 21 renewal fees shall be paid to the board. 22 Sec. 66. Section 148B.2, Code 2026, is amended by adding the 23 following new subsection: 24 NEW SUBSECTION . 1A. âDepartmentâ means the department of 25 inspections, appeals, and licensing. 26 Sec. 67. Section 148B.4, Code 2026, is amended to read as 27 follows: 28 148B.4 Limited permit. 29 1. A limited permit to practice occupational therapy may 30 be granted to a person who has completed the academic and 31 field work requirements for occupational therapists under 32 this chapter and has not yet taken or received the results of 33 the entry-level certification examination. A permit granted 34 pursuant to this subsection shall be valid for a period of 35 -25- LSB 5537HV (3) 91 ss/ko 25/ 62 H.F. 2666 time as determined by the board department by rule and shall 1 allow the person to practice occupational therapy under the 2 direction and appropriate supervision of an occupational 3 therapist licensed under this chapter . The permit shall expire 4 when the person is issued a license under section 148B.5 or 5 if the person is notified that the person did not pass the 6 examination. The limited permit shall not be renewed. 7 2. A limited permit to assist in the practice of 8 occupational therapy may be granted to a person who has 9 completed the academic and field work requirements for 10 occupational therapy assistants under this chapter and has 11 not yet taken or received the results of the entry-level 12 certification examination. A permit granted pursuant to this 13 subsection shall be valid for a period of time as determined 14 by the board department by rule and shall allow the person 15 to assist in the practice of occupational therapy under the 16 direction and appropriate supervision of an occupational 17 therapist licensed under this chapter . The permit shall expire 18 when the person is issued a license under section 148B.5 or 19 if the person is notified that the person did not pass the 20 examination. The limited permit shall not be renewed. 21 Sec. 68. Section 148B.5, unnumbered paragraph 1, Code 2026, 22 is amended to read as follows: 23 An applicant applying for a license as an occupational 24 therapist or as an occupational therapy assistant must file a 25 written an application on forms provided in a manner prescribed 26 by the board, showing to the satisfaction of the board that the 27 applicant meets the following requirements: 28 Sec. 69. Section 148B.7, Code 2026, is amended to read as 29 follows: 30 148B.7 Board of physical and occupational therapy ââ powers 31 and duties. 32 The board shall adopt rules relating to professional conduct 33 to carry out the policy of this chapter , chapter 147, and 34 chapter 272C , including but not limited to rules relating to 35 -26- LSB 5537HV (3) 91 ss/ko 26/ 62 H.F. 2666 professional licensing and to the establishment of ethical 1 standards of practice for persons holding a license to practice 2 occupational therapy in this state. 3 Sec. 70. Section 148C.3, subsection 1, unnumbered paragraph 4 1, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 5 The board shall adopt rules to govern the licensure of 6 physician assistants. An applicant for licensure shall submit 7 the fee prescribed by the board department and shall meet the 8 requirements established by the board with respect to each of 9 the following: 10 Sec. 71. Section 148C.3, subsection 4, Code 2026, is amended 11 by striking the subsection. 12 Sec. 72. Section 148E.7, Code 2026, is amended to read as 13 follows: 14 148E.7 Duties of board. 15 The board shall adopt rules consistent with this chapter , 16 and chapter 147 , and chapter 272C which are necessary for the 17 performance of its the boardâs duties. 18 Sec. 73. Section 148F.3, subsection 5, Code 2026, is amended 19 by striking the subsection. 20 Sec. 74. Section 148G.1, Code 2026, is amended by adding the 21 following new subsection: 22 NEW SUBSECTION . 1A. âDepartmentâ means the department of 23 inspections, appeals, and licensing. 24 Sec. 75. Section 148G.6, subsection 1, unnumbered paragraph 25 1, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 26 Beginning January 1, 2017, a person seeking licensure as 27 a respiratory care and polysomnography practitioner or as a 28 polysomnographic technologist shall apply to the board and pay 29 the fees established by the board department for the type of 30 license for which the applicant is applying. Beginning with 31 the March 31, 2016, license renewal period, a person licensed 32 as a respiratory care practitioner who seeks a respiratory 33 care and polysomnography practitioner license shall make 34 such application with the application for license renewal 35 -27- LSB 5537HV (3) 91 ss/ko 27/ 62 H.F. 2666 and pay the fees established by the board department . The 1 fees established by the board for a respiratory care and 2 polysomnography practitioner license shall not exceed one 3 hundred twenty percent of the cost of a respiratory care 4 practitioner license issued pursuant to chapter 152B or a 5 polysomnographic technologist license issued pursuant to 6 this section . The application for a respiratory care and 7 polysomnography practitioner license must meet the requirements 8 of this section . Upon receipt of an application, the board 9 shall conduct a background check of the applicant. An 10 application for either type of licensure shall show that the 11 applicant is of good moral character and is at least eighteen 12 years of age, and shall include proof that the person has 13 satisfied one of the following educational requirements: 14 Sec. 76. Section 148G.6, subsection 5, Code 2026, is amended 15 by striking the subsection. 16 Sec. 77. Section 148I.2, subsection 2, paragraph e, Code 17 2026, is amended to read as follows: 18 e. Submit an application fee as prescribed by the board by 19 rule provided in section 147.80 . 20 Sec. 78. Section 148I.4, subsection 1, unnumbered paragraph 21 1, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 22 The board shall adopt rules consistent with this chapter , 23 and chapter 147 , and chapter 272C which are necessary for the 24 performance of the boardâs duties. The rules shall do all of 25 the following: 26 Sec. 79. Section 148I.4, subsection 1, paragraph m, Code 27 2026, is amended to read as follows: 28 m. Establish Require an annual license fee as provided in 29 section 147.80 . 30 Sec. 80. Section 152.8, subsection 1, Code 2026, is amended 31 to read as follows: 32 1. A license possessed by an applicant from a state 33 which has not adopted the nurse licensure compact contained 34 in section 152E.1 or the advanced practice registered nurse 35 -28- LSB 5537HV (3) 91 ss/ko 28/ 62 H.F. 2666 compact contained in section 152E.3 shall be recognized by 1 the board under conditions specified which indicate that the 2 licensee meets all the qualifications required under section 3 152.7 . If a foreign license is recognized, the board may issue 4 a reciprocal license by endorsement without an examination 5 being required. Recognition shall be based on whether the 6 foreign licensee is qualified to practice nursing. The board 7 may issue a temporary license to a natural person an individual 8 who has completed the requirements of and applied for licensure 9 by endorsement a reciprocal license . The board shall determine 10 the length of time a temporary license shall remain effective. 11 Sec. 81. Section 152B.6, subsection 2, Code 2026, is amended 12 to read as follows: 13 2. The establishment of a system for the licensure of 14 respiratory care practitioners and the establishment and 15 collection of licensure fees . 16 Sec. 82. Section 152B.12, Code 2026, is amended to read as 17 follows: 18 152B.12 Suspension and revocation of licenses. 19 The board may suspend , or revoke or impose probationary 20 conditions upon a license issued pursuant to rules adopted in 21 accordance with section 152B.6 , or decline to renew a license, 22 for a violation of a provision of this chapter, section 147.55, 23 section 272C.10, or rules adopted by the board . 24 Sec. 83. Section 152C.3, subsection 1, paragraph c, Code 25 2026, is amended to read as follows: 26 c. Payment of a reasonable fee required by the board which 27 shall compensate and be retained by the board for the costs of 28 administering this chapter pursuant to section 147.80 . 29 Sec. 84. Section 152C.7, Code 2026, is amended to read as 30 follows: 31 152C.7 Suspension and revocation of licenses. 32 The board may suspend , or revoke, or impose probationary 33 conditions upon a license issued pursuant to rules adopted in 34 accordance with section 152C.3 decline to renew, a license for 35 -29- LSB 5537HV (3) 91 ss/ko 29/ 62 H.F. 2666 a violation of a provision of this chapter, section 147.55, 1 section 272C.10, or rules adopted by the board . 2 Sec. 85. Section 152D.3, subsection 2, Code 2026, is amended 3 to read as follows: 4 2. Application and renewal procedures, fees, Applications 5 and reciprocal agreements shall be provided submitted in 6 accordance with rules adopted by the board pursuant to chapter 7 17A . 8 Sec. 86. Section 152D.5, subsection 1, Code 2026, is amended 9 to read as follows: 10 1. Adopt rules consistent with this chapter , and chapter 11 147 , and chapter 272C which are necessary for the performance 12 of its the boardâs duties. 13 Sec. 87. Section 152D.5, subsection 4, Code 2026, is amended 14 by striking the subsection. 15 Sec. 88. Section 153.12, Code 2026, is amended to read as 16 follows: 17 153.12 Board and department defined. 18 As used in this chapter , âboardâ : 19 1. âBoardâ means the dental board created under chapter 147 . 20 2. âDepartmentâ means the department of inspections, 21 appeals, and licensing. 22 Sec. 89. Section 153.22, Code 2026, is amended to read as 23 follows: 24 153.22 Resident license. 25 A dentist or dental hygienist who is serving only as a 26 resident, intern, or graduate student and who is not licensed 27 to practice in this state is required to obtain from the board 28 a temporary or special license to practice as a resident, 29 intern, or graduate student. The license shall be designated 30 âResident Licenseâ and shall authorize the licensee to serve 31 as a resident, intern, or graduate student only, under the 32 supervision of a licensed practitioner, in an institution 33 approved for this purpose by the board. Such license shall 34 be renewed at the discretion of the board. The fee for a 35 -30- LSB 5537HV (3) 91 ss/ko 30/ 62 H.F. 2666 resident license and the renewal fee shall be set by the board 1 based upon the cost of issuance of the license. The board 2 shall determine in each instance those eligible for a resident 3 license, whether or not examinations shall be given, and the 4 type of examination. None of the requirements for regular 5 permanent licensure are mandatory for resident licensure except 6 as specifically designated by the board. The issuance of a 7 resident license shall not in any way indicate that the person 8 so licensed is necessarily eligible for regular licensure or 9 that the board is obligated to so license the person. The 10 board may revoke a resident license at any time it shall 11 determine either that the caliber of work done by a licensee 12 or the type of supervision being given such licensee does not 13 conform to reasonable standards established by the board. 14 Sec. 90. Section 153.33, subsection 1, paragraph b, Code 15 2026, is amended by striking the paragraph. 16 Sec. 91. Section 153.33, subsection 1, paragraph e, Code 17 2026, is amended to read as follows: 18 e. To promulgate adopt rules as may be necessary to 19 implement the provisions of this chapter , chapter 147, and 20 chapter 272C . 21 Sec. 92. Section 153.33, subsections 3 and 4, Code 2026, are 22 amended by striking the subsections. 23 Sec. 93. Section 153.37, Code 2026, is amended to read as 24 follows: 25 153.37 Dental college and dental hygiene program faculty 26 permits. 27 The board may issue a faculty permit entitling the holder 28 to practice dentistry or dental hygiene within a college of 29 dentistry or a dental hygiene program and affiliated teaching 30 facilities as an adjunct to the faculty memberâs teaching 31 position, associated responsibilities, and functions. The dean 32 of the college of dentistry or chairperson of a dental hygiene 33 program shall certify to the board those bona fide members of 34 the collegeâs or a dental hygiene programâs faculty who are not 35 -31- LSB 5537HV (3) 91 ss/ko 31/ 62 H.F. 2666 licensed and registered to practice dentistry or dental hygiene 1 in Iowa. Any faculty member so certified shall, prior to 2 commencing the memberâs duties in the college of dentistry or a 3 dental hygiene program, make written application to the board 4 for a permit. The permit shall be for a period determined by 5 the board and may be renewed at the discretion of the board. 6 The fee for the faculty permit and the renewal shall be set by 7 the board based upon the administrative cost of issuance of 8 the permit. The fee shall be deposited in the same manner as 9 fees provided for in section 147.82 . The faculty permit shall 10 be valid during the time the holder remains a member of the 11 faculty and shall subject the holder to all provisions of this 12 chapter . 13 Sec. 94. Section 154A.13, Code 2026, is amended to read as 14 follows: 15 154A.13 Temporary permit. 16 A person who has not been licensed as a hearing aid 17 specialist may obtain a temporary permit from the department 18 upon completion of the application accompanied by the written 19 verification of employment from a licensed hearing aid 20 specialist or an audiologist licensed pursuant to chapter 154F . 21 The department shall issue a temporary permit for two years 22 which that shall not be renewed or reissued for more than a 23 total of two years . The fee for issuance of the temporary 24 permit shall be set by the department in accordance with the 25 provisions for establishment of fees by boards in section 26 147.80 . The temporary permit entitles an applicant to engage 27 in the fitting or selection and sale of hearing aids under 28 the supervision of a person holding a valid license or an 29 audiologist licensed pursuant to chapter 154F . 30 Sec. 95. Section 154B.6, subsections 3 and 4, Code 2026, are 31 amended to read as follows: 32 3. A person who possesses a doctoral degree in psychology 33 from an institution approved by the board but who has not 34 completed the other requirements for licensure under this 35 -32- LSB 5537HV (3) 91 ss/ko 32/ 62 H.F. 2666 section may apply for a provisional license. The license shall 1 be designated as a âprovisional license in psychologyâ. The 2 provisional license shall authorize the licensee to practice 3 psychology under the supervision of a supervisor who meets the 4 qualifications determined by the board by rule. A provisional 5 license shall be valid for a period of two years. The fee for 6 a provisional license shall be set by the board to cover the 7 administrative costs of issuance. The board shall also set a 8 fee for renewal of a provisional license. 9 4. A person who is enrolled in a doctoral degree program in 10 psychology at an institution approved by the board but who has 11 not completed the other requirements for licensure under this 12 section may apply for a provisional license during the personâs 13 internship program. The license shall be designated as a 14 âprovisional license in psychologyâ. The provisional license 15 shall authorize the licensee to practice psychology under 16 the supervision of a supervisor who meets the qualifications 17 determined by the board by rule. A provisional license shall 18 be valid for a period of two years. The fee for a provisional 19 license shall be set by the board to cover the administrative 20 costs of issuance. The board shall also set a fee for renewal 21 of a provisional license. 22 Sec. 96. Section 154B.13, subsection 1, paragraph a, Code 23 2026, is amended to read as follows: 24 a. Procedures to obtain a conditional prescription 25 certificate, a prescription certificate, and a renewal of 26 a prescription certificate. The board may set reasonable 27 application and renewal fees. 28 Sec. 97. Section 154C.3, subsection 3, Code 2026, is amended 29 to read as follows: 30 3. License renewal and continuing education. Licenses 31 The terms of each license shall be renewed biennially, and 32 licensees determined by the department of inspections, appeals, 33 and licensing by rule. Licensees shall pay a fee for renewal 34 as determined by the board department of inspections, appeals, 35 -33- LSB 5537HV (3) 91 ss/ko 33/ 62 H.F. 2666 and licensing and shall present evidence satisfactory to the 1 board that the licensee has satisfied continuing education 2 requirements as determined by the board. The board shall 3 not limit the number of continuing education credits that 4 may be obtained online in satisfying continuing education 5 requirements, provided that any online program providing 6 continuing education credits online shall comply with standards 7 set by the board. 8 Sec. 98. Section 154D.7, Code 2026, is amended to read as 9 follows: 10 154D.7 Temporary license ââ marital and family therapy ââ 11 mental health counseling ââ fees. 12 Any person who has fulfilled all of the requirements for 13 licensure under section 154D.2 , except for having completed 14 the postgraduate supervised clinical experience requirement as 15 determined by the board by rule, may apply to the board for a 16 temporary license. The license shall be designated âtemporary 17 license in marital and family therapyâ or âtemporary license in 18 mental health counselingâ and shall authorize the licensee to 19 practice marital and family therapy or mental health counseling 20 under the supervision of a qualified supervisor as determined 21 by the board by rule. The license shall be valid for three 22 years and may be renewed at the discretion of the board. The 23 fee for a temporary license shall be set by the board to 24 cover the administrative costs of issuing the license, and if 25 renewed, a renewal fee as set by the board shall be required. 26 Sec. 99. Section 154D.8, unnumbered paragraph 1, Code 2026, 27 is amended to read as follows: 28 An applicant who has been a licensed marital and family 29 therapist or licensed mental health counselor under the laws 30 of another jurisdiction may file an application with the board 31 for licensure by endorsement reciprocity . The board shall 32 adopt rules requiring an applicant for licensure by endorsement 33 reciprocity to do all of the following: 34 Sec. 100. Section 154E.2, subsection 1, Code 2026, is 35 -34- LSB 5537HV (3) 91 ss/ko 34/ 62 H.F. 2666 amended to read as follows: 1 1. Adopt rules consistent with this chapter , and with 2 chapter 147 , and chapter 272C which are necessary for the 3 performance of its the boardâs duties. 4 Sec. 101. Section 154E.3A, Code 2026, is amended to read as 5 follows: 6 154E.3A Temporary license. 7 An individual who does not meet the requirements for 8 licensure by examination pursuant to section 154E.3 may apply 9 for or renew a temporary license. The temporary license 10 shall authorize the licensee to practice as a sign language 11 interpreter or transliterator under the direct supervision 12 of a sign language interpreter or transliterator licensed 13 pursuant to section 154E.3 . The temporary license shall be 14 valid for two years one year and may only be renewed one time 15 in accordance with standards established by rule be renewed at 16 the discretion of the board . An individual shall not practice 17 for more than a total of four years under a temporary license. 18 The board may revoke a temporary license if it determines that 19 the temporary licensee has violated standards established by 20 rule. The board may adopt requirements for temporary licensure 21 to implement this section . 22 Sec. 102. Section 154E.3B, subsection 3, Code 2026, is 23 amended to read as follows: 24 3. The board shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 17A , 25 and consistent with chapters 147 and 272C, for the process of 26 applying for, granting, suspending, reinstating, renewing, and 27 revoking a license issued pursuant to this section . 28 Sec. 103. Section 154F.5, Code 2026, is amended to read as 29 follows: 30 154F.5 Temporary clinical license ââ fee. 31 Any person who has fulfilled all of the requirements for 32 licensure under this chapter , except for having completed the 33 nine monthsâ clinical experience requirement as provided in 34 section 154F.3, subsection 1 or 2 , may apply to the board for a 35 -35- LSB 5537HV (3) 91 ss/ko 35/ 62 H.F. 2666 temporary clinical license. The license shall be designated 1 âtemporary clinical license in speech pathologyâ or âtemporary 2 clinical license in audiologyâ and shall authorize the licensee 3 to practice speech pathology or audiology under the supervision 4 of a licensed speech pathologist or licensed audiologist, as 5 appropriate. The license shall be valid for one year and 6 may be renewed at the discretion of the board. The fee for 7 a temporary clinical license shall be set by the board to 8 cover the administrative costs of issuing the license, and if 9 renewed, a renewal fee as set by the board shall be required. A 10 temporary clinical license shall be issued only upon evidence 11 satisfactory to the board that the applicant will be supervised 12 by a person licensed as a speech pathologist or audiologist, 13 as appropriate. 14 Sec. 104. Section 154F.6, Code 2026, is amended to read as 15 follows: 16 154F.6 Temporary permit. 17 The board may, at its discretion, issue a temporary permit 18 to a nonresident authorizing the permittee to practice 19 speech pathology or audiology in this state for a period 20 not to exceed three months whenever, in the opinion of the 21 board, a need exists and the permittee , in the opinion of the 22 board, possesses the necessary qualifications which shall be 23 substantially equivalent to those required for licensure by 24 this chapter . 25 Sec. 105. Section 155.4, Code 2026, is amended to read as 26 follows: 27 155.4 Licensing function. 28 The board shall license nursing home administrators in 29 accordance with this chapter , chapter 147 , chapter 272C , and 30 rules issued by the board. A nursing home administratorâs 31 license shall not be transferable and, if not inactive, 32 shall be valid until revoked pursuant to section 147.55 or 33 voluntarily surrendered. 34 Sec. 106. Section 155.5, Code 2026, is amended to read as 35 -36- LSB 5537HV (3) 91 ss/ko 36/ 62 H.F. 2666 follows: 1 155.5 License fees. 2 Each person licensed as a nursing home administrator shall 3 be required to must pay a license fee in an amount to be fixed 4 by the board department of inspections, appeals, and licensing . 5 The license shall expire in multiyear intervals determined by 6 the board department of inspections, appeals, and licensing and 7 be renewable upon payment of a renewal fee. A person who fails 8 to renew a license by the expiration date shall be allowed to 9 do so within thirty days following its expiration, but the 10 board may assess a reasonable penalty. 11 Sec. 107. Section 155A.3, Code 2026, is amended by adding 12 the following new subsection: 13 NEW SUBSECTION . 10A. âDepartmentâ means the department of 14 inspections, appeals, and licensing. 15 Sec. 108. Section 155A.7, subsections 1 and 2, Code 2026, 16 are amended to read as follows: 17 1. Registration programs for pharmacist-interns, pharmacy 18 technicians, and pharmacy support persons are established for 19 the purposes of identification, tracking, and disciplinary 20 action for the violation of federal drug laws or regulations, 21 state drug or pharmacy laws, or rules of the board and 22 department . 23 2. A person who is or desires to be a pharmacist-intern, 24 pharmacy technician, or pharmacy support person in this state 25 shall apply to the board for registration on a form prescribed 26 by the board department . 27 a. A pharmacist-intern shall be registered during internship 28 training and thereafter pursuant to rules adopted by the board. 29 b. An applicant for a new pharmacy technician registration 30 or for a pharmacy technician renewal shall provide proof of 31 current certification by a national technician certification 32 authority approved by the board. A person who is in the 33 process of acquiring national certification as a pharmacy 34 technician and who is in training to become a pharmacy 35 -37- LSB 5537HV (3) 91 ss/ko 37/ 62 H.F. 2666 technician shall register with the board as a pharmacy 1 technician. 2 Sec. 109. Section 155A.7, subsection 3, unnumbered 3 paragraph 1, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 4 The board shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 17A on 5 matters pertaining to pharmacist-intern, pharmacy technician, 6 and pharmacy support person registration, renewals, fees, 7 training, national certification for pharmacy technicians, 8 approval of preceptors for pharmacist-interns, and other 9 relevant matters. The department shall adopt rules pursuant to 10 chapter 17A related to registration, renewal, and fees. 11 Sec. 110. Section 155A.8, subsection 4, Code 2026, is 12 amended to read as follows: 13 4. The board department shall specify by rule procedures 14 and fees to renew a pharmacist license and penalties for late 15 renewal or failure to renew a pharmacist license. 16 Sec. 111. Section 155A.13, subsection 2, Code 2026, is 17 amended to read as follows: 18 2. The board department shall specify by rule the licensing 19 procedures to be followed, including specifications of forms 20 for use in applying for a pharmacy license and fees for filing 21 an application. 22 Sec. 112. Section 155A.13, subsection 6, unnumbered 23 paragraph 1, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 24 To qualify for a pharmacy license, the applicant shall 25 submit to the board a license fee as determined by the board 26 department and a completed application on a form prescribed 27 by the board department . The application shall include the 28 following and such other information as required by rules of 29 adopted by the board department and shall be given under oath: 30 Sec. 113. Section 155A.13A, subsection 1, unnumbered 31 paragraph 1, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 32 A pharmacy located outside of this state that delivers, 33 dispenses, or distributes by any method, prescription drugs 34 or devices to an ultimate user in this state shall obtain 35 -38- LSB 5537HV (3) 91 ss/ko 38/ 62 H.F. 2666 a nonresident pharmacy license from the board. The board 1 department shall make available an application form for a 2 nonresident pharmacy license and shall require such information 3 it deems necessary to fulfill the purposes of this section . A 4 nonresident pharmacy shall do all of the following in order to 5 obtain a nonresident pharmacy license from the board: 6 Sec. 114. Section 155A.13A, subsection 1, paragraph a, Code 7 2026, is amended to read as follows: 8 a. Submit a completed application form and an application 9 fee as determined by the board department . 10 Sec. 115. Section 155A.13C, subsection 1, unnumbered 11 paragraph 1, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 12 Any compounding facility that is registered as an 13 outsourcing facility, as defined in 21 U.S.C. Â§353b, that 14 distributes sterile compounded human drug products without 15 a patient-specific prescription to an authorized agent or 16 practitioner in this state shall obtain an outsourcing facility 17 license from the board prior to engaging in such distribution. 18 If an outsourcing facility dispenses prescription drugs 19 pursuant to patient-specific prescriptions to patients in Iowa, 20 the outsourcing facility shall obtain and maintain a valid Iowa 21 pharmacy license or Iowa nonresident pharmacy license under 22 this chapter . The board department shall make available an 23 application form for an outsourcing facility license and shall 24 require such information it deems necessary to fulfill the 25 purposes of this section . An outsourcing facility shall do all 26 of the following in order to obtain an outsourcing facility 27 license from the board: 28 Sec. 116. Section 155A.13C, subsection 1, paragraph a, Code 29 2026, is amended to read as follows: 30 a. Submit a completed application form and application fee 31 as determined by the board department . 32 Sec. 117. Section 155A.13C, subsection 2, Code 2026, is 33 amended by striking the subsection. 34 Sec. 118. Section 155A.14, Code 2026, is amended to read as 35 -39- LSB 5537HV (3) 91 ss/ko 39/ 62 H.F. 2666 follows: 1 155A.14 Renewal of pharmacy license. 2 The board department shall specify by rule the procedures to 3 be followed and the fee to be paid for a renewal certificate, 4 and the penalties for late renewal or failure to renew a 5 pharmacy license. 6 Sec. 119. Section 155A.17, subsection 3, Code 2026, is 7 amended to read as follows: 8 3. The board shall adopt rules establishing requirements 9 for wholesale distributor licenses , licensure fees, and other 10 relevant matters consistent with the federal Drug Supply Chain 11 Security Act, 21 U.S.C. Â§360eee et seq. Licensure fees shall 12 be established by the department by rule. 13 Sec. 120. Section 155A.17A, subsection 3, Code 2026, is 14 amended to read as follows: 15 3. The board shall adopt rules establishing requirements 16 for a third-party logistics provider license , licensure fees, 17 and other relevant matters consistent with the federal Drug 18 Supply Chain Security Act, 21 U.S.C. Â§360eee et seq. Licensure 19 fees shall be established by the department by rule. 20 Sec. 121. Section 155A.43, Code 2026, is amended to read as 21 follows: 22 155A.43 Pharmaceutical collection and disposal program ââ 23 annual allocation. 24 Of the fees collected by the board department pursuant to 25 sections 124.301 and 147.80 and this chapter , and retained by 26 the board department pursuant to section 147.82 , the board 27 department may annually allocate a sum deemed by the board 28 department to be adequate for administering the pharmaceutical 29 collection and disposal program. The program shall provide 30 for the management and disposal of unused, excess, and expired 31 pharmaceuticals, including the management and disposal 32 of controlled substances pursuant to state and federal 33 regulations. The board department may contract with one or 34 more vendors for the provision of supplies and services to 35 -40- LSB 5537HV (3) 91 ss/ko 40/ 62 H.F. 2666 manage and maintain the program and to safely and appropriately 1 dispose of pharmaceuticals collected through the program. 2 Sec. 122. Section 156.8, Code 2026, is amended to read as 3 follows: 4 156.8 Internships. 5 The board shall, by rule, provide for internships in 6 mortuary science, and shall regulate the registration , and 7 training , and fee for internships. 8 Sec. 123. Section 156.14, subsection 2, Code 2026, is 9 amended to read as follows: 10 2. The board shall specify by rule the licensing procedures 11 to be followed, including specifications of forms for use in 12 applying for an establishment license and fees for filing an 13 application. The board shall specify by rule minimum standards 14 for professional responsibility in the conduct of a funeral 15 establishment or a cremation establishment. 16 Sec. 124. Section 156.14, subsection 3, unnumbered 17 paragraph 1, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 18 To qualify for a funeral establishment or a cremation 19 establishment license, the applicant shall submit to the board 20 a license fee as determined by the board and a completed 21 application on a form prescribed by the board that shall 22 include the following information and be given under oath: 23 Sec. 125. Section 156.15, subsection 2, Code 2026, is 24 amended by adding the following new paragraphs: 25 NEW PARAGRAPH . e. Failed to keep and maintain records 26 required by this chapter or rules adopted under this chapter. 27 NEW PARAGRAPH . f. Violated section 147.55 or 272C.10. 28 Sec. 126. Section 156.15, subsection 3, Code 2026, is 29 amended by striking the subsection. 30 Sec. 127. Section 157.4, subsection 2, Code 2026, is amended 31 to read as follows: 32 2. The fee for a temporary permit shall be established by 33 the board department as provided in section 147.80 . 34 Sec. 128. Section 157.4, subsection 3, paragraph e, Code 35 -41- LSB 5537HV (3) 91 ss/ko 41/ 62 H.F. 2666 2026, is amended to read as follows: 1 e. An applicant shall submit an application fee determined 2 by the board department by rule. 3 Sec. 129. Section 157.4B, subsection 3, Code 2026, is 4 amended by striking the subsection. 5 Sec. 130. Section 157.8, subsection 2, paragraph a, Code 6 2026, is amended to read as follows: 7 a. The application for a license for a school shall be 8 accompanied by the annual license fee determined pursuant to 9 section 147.80 , and shall state the name and location of the 10 school and such other additional information as the board may 11 require. The license is valid for one year a period determined 12 by the department by rule and may be renewed. 13 Sec. 131. Section 157.8, subsection 3, paragraph c, Code 14 2026, is amended to read as follows: 15 c. A person employed as an instructor in the barbering 16 and cosmetology arts and sciences by a licensed school shall 17 be licensed in the practice and shall possess a separate 18 instructorâs license which shall be renewed biennially on 19 a schedule as determined by the department by rule . An 20 instructor shall file an application with the department on 21 forms prescribed by the board. Requirements for licensure as 22 an instructor shall be determined by the board by rule. 23 Sec. 132. Section 157.9, Code 2026, is amended to read as 24 follows: 25 157.9 License suspension and revocation. 26 Any license issued by the department under the provisions 27 of this chapter may be suspended, revoked, or renewal denied 28 by the board for violation of any provision of this chapter , 29 chapter 147, chapter 272C, or rules promulgated by the board 30 under the provisions of chapter 17A . 31 Sec. 133. Section 157.11, subsection 2, Code 2026, is 32 amended to read as follows: 33 2. The application shall be accompanied by the biennial 34 license fee determined pursuant to section 147.80 . The license 35 -42- LSB 5537HV (3) 91 ss/ko 42/ 62 H.F. 2666 is valid for two years a term determined by the department by 1 rule and may be renewed. 2 Sec. 134. Section 272C.3, subsection 2, paragraph a, Code 3 2026, is amended to read as follows: 4 a. Revoke a license, or suspend a license either until 5 further order of the board or for a specified period, upon any 6 of the grounds specified in section 100D.5 , 105.22 , 147.55 , 7 148.6 , 148B.7 , 152.10 , 153.34 , 154A.24 , 169.13 , 455B.219 , 8 542.10 , 542B.21 , 543B.29 , 544A.13 , 544B.15 , or 602.3203 or 9 chapter 151 or 155 , as applicable, or upon any other grounds 10 specifically provided for in this chapter for revocation of 11 the license of a licensee subject to the jurisdiction of 12 that board, or upon failure of the licensee to comply with a 13 decision of the board imposing licensee discipline. 14 Sec. 135. Section 272C.4, subsection 6, Code 2026, is 15 amended to read as follows: 16 6. Define by rule acts or omissions that are grounds for 17 revocation or suspension of a license under section 100D.5 , 18 105.22 , 147.55 , 148.6 , 148B.7 , 152.10 , 153.34 , 154A.24 , 169.13 , 19 455B.219 , 542.10 , 542B.21 , 543B.29 , 544A.13 , 544B.15 , or 20 602.3203 or chapter 148I , 151 , or 155 , as applicable, and to 21 define by rule acts or omissions that constitute negligence, 22 careless acts, or omissions within the meaning of section 23 272C.3, subsection 2 , paragraph âbâ , which licensees are 24 required to report to the board pursuant to section 272C.9, 25 subsection 2 . 26 Sec. 136. Section 272C.5, subsection 2, paragraph c, Code 27 2026, is amended to read as follows: 28 c. Shall state whether the procedures are an alternative 29 to or an addition to the procedures stated in sections 100D.5 , 30 105.23 , 105.24 , 148.6 through 148.9 , 152.10 , 152.11 , 153.33 , 31 and 154A.23 , 542.11 , 542B.22 , 543B.35 , 543B.36 , and 544B.16 . 32 Sec. 137. Section 459.102, subsection 44, Code 2026, is 33 amended to read as follows: 34 44. âProfessional engineerâ means a person engaged in the 35 -43- LSB 5537HV (3) 91 ss/ko 43/ 62 H.F. 2666 practice of engineering as defined in section 542B.2 who is 1 has been issued a certificate of licensure as a professional 2 engineer pursuant to section 542B.17 . 3 Sec. 138. Section 538A.2, subsection 2, paragraph e, Code 4 2026, is amended to read as follows: 5 e. A person licensed as a real estate broker or salesperson , 6 under section 543B.20 chapter 543B , acting within the course 7 and scope of that license. 8 Sec. 139. Section 542.4, subsection 1, unnumbered paragraph 9 1, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 10 An Iowa accountancy examining board is created within the 11 department of inspections, appeals, and licensing pursuant to 12 section 147.13 to administer and enforce this chapter . 13 Sec. 140. Section 542.4, subsection 9, paragraph t, Code 14 2026, is amended to read as follows: 15 t. Such other rules as the board deems necessary or 16 appropriate for administering this chapter , including but not 17 limited to rules establishing fees and rules of professional 18 conduct, pertaining to corporations or limited liability 19 companies practicing accounting, which the board deems 20 consistent with or required by the public welfare. The 21 board may adopt rules governing the style, name, and title of 22 corporations and limited liability companies and governing the 23 affiliation of corporations and limited liability companies 24 with other organizations. 25 Sec. 141. Section 542.5, subsection 11, Code 2026, is 26 amended by striking the subsection. 27 Sec. 142. Section 542.6, subsection 4, Code 2026, is amended 28 by striking the subsection. 29 Sec. 143. Section 542.6, subsection 6, Code 2026, is amended 30 to read as follows: 31 6. The board, by rule, shall require as a condition for 32 renewal of a certificate under this section, by that any 33 certificate holder who performs compilation services for the 34 public other than through a certified public accounting firm or 35 -44- LSB 5537HV (3) 91 ss/ko 44/ 62 H.F. 2666 licensed public accounting firm, that such individual undergo , 1 no more frequently than once every three years, a peer review 2 conducted in such manner as the board shall specify by rule 3 specify , and such review shall include verification that such 4 individual has met the competency requirements set out in 5 professional standards for such services. The provisions of 6 section 542.7, subsections 10, 11, and 12 , shall apply to the 7 peer review required in this subsection . 8 Sec. 144. Section 542.7, subsections 2 and 5, Code 2026, are 9 amended by striking the subsections. 10 Sec. 145. Section 542.8, subsection 14, Code 2026, is 11 amended by striking the subsection. 12 Sec. 146. Section 542B.3, Code 2026, is amended to read as 13 follows: 14 542B.3 Engineering and land surveying examining board 15 created. 16 An engineering and land surveying examining board is 17 created within the department of inspections, appeals, and 18 licensing. The board consists of three members who are 19 licensed professional engineers, two members who are licensed 20 professional land surveyors, and two members who are not 21 licensed professional engineers or licensed professional land 22 surveyors and who shall represent the general public. An 23 individual who is licensed as both a professional engineer and 24 a professional land surveyor may serve to satisfy the board 25 membership requirement for either a licensed professional 26 engineer or a licensed professional land surveyor, but not 27 both. Members shall be appointed by the governor subject 28 to confirmation by the senate. A licensed member shall 29 be actively engaged in the practice of engineering or land 30 surveying and shall have been so engaged for five years 31 preceding the appointment, the last two of which shall have 32 been in Iowa. Insofar as practicable, licensed engineer 33 members of the board shall be from different branches of the 34 profession of engineering. Professional associations or 35 -45- LSB 5537HV (3) 91 ss/ko 45/ 62 H.F. 2666 societies composed of licensed engineers or licensed land 1 surveyors may recommend the names of potential board members 2 whose profession is representative of that association or 3 society to the governor. However, the governor is not bound by 4 the recommendations. A board member shall not be required to 5 be a member of any professional association or society composed 6 of professional engineers or professional land surveyors. 7 Sec. 147. Section 542B.15, Code 2026, is amended to read as 8 follows: 9 542B.15 Examinations ââ report required . 10 Examinations for licensure shall be given as often as 11 deemed necessary by the department of inspections, appeals, 12 and licensing, but no less than one time per year. The scope 13 of the examinations and the methods of procedure shall be 14 prescribed by the board. The identity of the person taking 15 the examination shall be concealed until after the examination 16 has been graded by the department of inspections, appeals, 17 and licensing. As soon as practicable after the close of 18 each examination, a report shall be filed in the office of 19 the secretary of the board by the department of inspections, 20 appeals, and licensing. The report shall show the action of 21 the board upon each application and the secretary of the board 22 shall notify each applicant of the result of the applicantâs 23 examination. Applicants who fail the examination once shall 24 be allowed to take the examination at the next scheduled 25 time. Thereafter, the applicant shall be allowed to take the 26 examination at the discretion of the board. An applicant who 27 has failed the examination may request in writing information 28 from the board concerning the applicantâs examination grade and 29 subject areas or questions which the applicant failed to answer 30 correctly, except that if the board administers a uniform, 31 standardized examination, the board shall only be required 32 to provide the examination grade and such other information 33 concerning the applicantâs examination results which are 34 available to the board. 35 -46- LSB 5537HV (3) 91 ss/ko 46/ 62 H.F. 2666 Sec. 148. Section 542B.27, subsection 4, Code 2026, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 4. Before issuing an order under this section , the board 3 shall provide the person written notice and the opportunity to 4 request a hearing on the record. The hearing must be requested 5 within thirty days of the issuance of the notice and shall be 6 conducted in the same manner as provided in section 542B.22 . 7 Sec. 149. Section 543B.31, Code 2026, is amended to read as 8 follows: 9 543B.31 Place of business ââ branch license. 10 Every real estate broker, except as provided in section 11 543B.22 , shall maintain a place of business in this state. A 12 real estate broker may maintain more than one place of business 13 within the state and a broker may be the designated broker 14 of more than one branch office within the state. If the 15 real estate broker maintains more than one place of business 16 within the state, a duplicate license shall be issued to such 17 broker for each branch office maintained. A fee determined by 18 the real estate commission shall be paid for each duplicate 19 license. 20 Sec. 150. Section 543D.4, subsection 1, Code 2026, is 21 amended to read as follows: 22 1. A real estate appraiser examining board is established 23 within the department of inspections, appeals, and licensing. 24 The board consists of five members, one of whom shall be a 25 public member and four of whom shall be certified real estate 26 appraisers. 27 Sec. 151. Section 543D.4, subsections 2, 3, 4, 5, 6, 7, 8, 28 9, and 10, Code 2026, are amended by striking the subsections. 29 Sec. 152. Section 543D.9, Code 2026, is amended to read as 30 follows: 31 543D.9 Education and experience requirement. 32 The board shall determine what real estate appraisal or real 33 estate appraisal review experience and what education shall be 34 required to provide appropriate assurance that an applicant for 35 -47- LSB 5537HV (3) 91 ss/ko 47/ 62 H.F. 2666 certification is competent to perform the certified appraisal 1 work which is within the scope of practice defined by the 2 board. All experience required for initial certification shall 3 be performed as a registered associate real estate appraiser 4 acting under the direct supervision of a certified real estate 5 appraiser who meets the supervisory requirements established 6 by applicable federal authorities or federal law, rule, or 7 policy in effect at the time the hours of experience are 8 claimed, except as the board may provide by rule. Subject 9 to requirements or limitations established by applicable 10 federal authorities or federal law, rule, or policy, hours 11 qualifying for experience in a bordering another state will 12 be considered qualifying hours for experience in this state 13 without requiring a waiver or authorization from the board 14 in accordance with rules and standards adopted by the board. 15 Qualifying hours completed in a bordering another state shall 16 be under the direct supervision of a certified real estate 17 appraiser with active certification in that bordering state. 18 The board shall prescribe a required minimum number of tested 19 hours of education relating to the provisions of this chapter , 20 the uniform appraisal standards, and other rules issued in 21 accordance with this chapter . 22 Sec. 153. Section 543D.21, subsection 1, Code 2026, is 23 amended by striking the subsection. 24 Sec. 154. Section 544A.1, subsection 2, Code 2026, is 25 amended to read as follows: 26 2. The architectural examining board is created within the 27 department of inspections, appeals, and licensing. The board 28 consists of four members who possess a license issued under 29 section 544A.9 , and one member who does not possess a license 30 issued under section 544A.9 and who shall represent the general 31 public. Members shall be appointed by the governor subject to 32 confirmation by the senate. 33 Sec. 155. Section 544A.1, subsection 3, Code 2026, is 34 amended by striking the subsection. 35 -48- LSB 5537HV (3) 91 ss/ko 48/ 62 H.F. 2666 Sec. 156. Section 544A.5, Code 2026, is amended to read as 1 follows: 2 544A.5 Duties. 3 The architectural examining board shall enforce this 4 chapter , shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 17A for the 5 examination of applicants for the license provided by this 6 chapter , and shall, after due public notice, hold meetings each 7 year for the purpose of examining applicants for licensure 8 and the transaction of business pertaining to the affairs of 9 the board. Examinations shall be given as often as deemed 10 necessary, but not less than annually. Action at a meeting 11 shall not be taken without the affirmative votes of a majority 12 of the members of the board. The director of the department 13 of inspections, appeals, and licensing shall hire and provide 14 staff to assist the board with implementing this chapter . 15 Sec. 157. Section 544A.8, subsection 1, Code 2026, is 16 amended to read as follows: 17 1. Any person may apply for a license or may apply to take 18 an examination for licensure under this chapter . The board 19 shall not require that the application contain a photograph of 20 the applicant. 21 Sec. 158. Section 544A.15, subsection 2, Code 2026, is 22 amended by striking the subsection. 23 Sec. 159. Section 544A.16, subsection 2, Code 2026, is 24 amended to read as follows: 25 2. âBoardâ means the architectural examining board 26 established created in section 544A.1 . 27 Sec. 160. Section 544A.29, Code 2026, is amended to read as 28 follows: 29 544A.29 Rules. 30 The board may adopt rules consistent with this chapter for 31 the administration and enforcement of pursuant to chapter 17A 32 to administer and enforce this chapter and may prescribe forms 33 to be issued , chapter 147, and chapter 272C . The rules may 34 include, but are not limited to, standards and criteria for 35 -49- LSB 5537HV (3) 91 ss/ko 49/ 62 H.F. 2666 licensure, license renewal, professional conduct, misconduct, 1 and discipline. Violation of a rule of conduct is grounds for 2 disciplinary action or reprimand or probation at the discretion 3 of the board. The board may enter into a consent order with 4 an architect which acknowledges an architectâs violation and 5 agreement to refrain from any further violation. A willful 6 or repeated violation of a rule of conduct is grounds for 7 disciplinary action as provided in section 544A.13 . 8 Sec. 161. Section 544B.1, subsection 1, Code 2026, is 9 amended to read as follows: 10 1. âBoardâ means the landscape architectural examining board 11 established created pursuant to section 544B.3 . 12 Sec. 162. Section 544B.3, Code 2026, is amended to read as 13 follows: 14 544B.3 Landscape architectural examining board created. 15 1. A landscape architectural examining board is created 16 within the department of inspections, appeals, and licensing. 17 The board consists of five members who are professional 18 landscape architects and two members who are not professional 19 landscape architects and who shall represent the general 20 public. Members shall be appointed by the governor, subject 21 to confirmation by the senate. Four of the five professional 22 members shall be actively engaged in the practice of landscape 23 architecture or the teaching of landscape architecture in 24 an accredited college or university, and shall have been so 25 engaged for five years preceding appointment, the last two of 26 which shall have been in Iowa. One of the five professional 27 members shall be actively engaged in the practice of landscape 28 architecture or the teaching of landscape architecture in an 29 accredited college or university, and may have been so engaged 30 for fewer than five years preceding appointment but at least 31 one year preceding appointment. Associations or societies 32 composed of professional landscape architects may recommend the 33 names of potential board members to the governor. However, 34 the governor is not bound by the recommendations. A board 35 -50- LSB 5537HV (3) 91 ss/ko 50/ 62 H.F. 2666 member shall not be required to be a member of any professional 1 association or society composed of professional landscape 2 architects. 3 2. Appointments shall be for three-year terms and shall 4 commence and end as provided in section 69.19 . Vacancies shall 5 be filled for the unexpired term by appointment of the governor 6 and are subject to senate confirmation. Members shall serve no 7 more than three terms or nine years, whichever is less. 8 Sec. 163. Section 544B.5, Code 2026, is amended to read as 9 follows: 10 544B.5 Duties. 11 The board shall enforce this chapter , chapter 147, and 12 chapter 272C, and shall make rules for the examination of 13 applicants for licensure. The board shall keep a record of 14 its proceedings. The board shall adopt an official seal which 15 shall be affixed to all certificates of licensure granted. 16 The board may make other rules, not inconsistent with law, as 17 necessary for the proper performance of its duties. The board 18 shall maintain a roster showing the name, place of business, 19 and residence, and the date and number of the certificate of 20 licensure of every professional landscape architect in this 21 state. The director of the department of inspections, appeals, 22 and licensing shall hire and provide staff to assist the board 23 in implementing this chapter . 24 Sec. 164. Section 544B.8, Code 2026, is amended to read as 25 follows: 26 544B.8 Examination. 27 1. A person applying for a certificate of licensure as a 28 professional landscape architect shall satisfactorily pass an 29 examination in technical and professional subjects prescribed 30 by the board. The board may adopt the uniform standardized 31 examination and grading procedures of a national certification 32 body recognized by the board. The examination may be conducted 33 by representatives of the board. The identity of a person 34 taking the examination shall be concealed until after the 35 -51- LSB 5537HV (3) 91 ss/ko 51/ 62 H.F. 2666 examination is graded. The fee for examination shall be based 1 on the annual cost of administering the examinations. The 2 public members of the board shall be allowed to participate in 3 administrative, clerical, or ministerial functions incident to 4 giving the examination, but shall not determine the content of 5 the examination or determine the correctness of the answers. 6 2. An applicant who has failed the examination may 7 request in writing information from the board concerning the 8 applicantâs examination grade and subject areas or questions 9 which the applicant failed to answer correctly, except that 10 if the board administers a uniform, standardized examination, 11 the board shall only be required to provide the examination 12 grade and such other information concerning the applicantâs 13 examination results which are available to the board. 14 Sec. 165. Section 544B.9, subsection 1, unnumbered 15 paragraph 1, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 16 Any person may apply for a certificate of licensure or 17 may apply to take an examination for such certification. 18 Applications for licensure shall be on forms prescribed and 19 furnished by the board, shall contain statements made under 20 oath, showing the applicantâs education and detail summary of 21 the applicantâs pertinent practical landscape architectural 22 work and experience. The board shall not require that a recent 23 photograph of the applicant be attached to the application 24 form. An applicant shall not be ineligible for licensure on 25 the basis of membership in any protected class under chapter 26 216 . The board may consider the past felony record of an 27 applicant only if the felony conviction relates directly to 28 the practice of landscape architecture. Character references 29 may be required but shall not be obtained from professional 30 landscape architects. Each applicant for licensure as 31 a professional landscape architect shall meet one of the 32 following requirements: 33 Sec. 166. Section 544B.20, subsection 5, Code 2026, is 34 amended to read as follows: 35 -52- LSB 5537HV (3) 91 ss/ko 52/ 62 H.F. 2666 5. To apply to the business conducted in this state by any 1 planner, agriculturist, soil conservationist, horticulturist, 2 tree expert, arborist, forester, nursery or landscape nursery 3 person, gardener, landscape gardener, landscape contractor, 4 garden or lawn caretaker, tiling contractor, grader or 5 cultivator of land, golf course designer or contractor, 6 or similar business. However, such person shall not use 7 the designation landscape architect or any title or device 8 indicating or representing that such person is a professional 9 landscape architect or is practicing landscape architecture 10 unless such person is licensed under the provisions of section 11 544B.11 pursuant to this chapter . 12 Sec. 167. Section 544C.2, subsection 1, Code 2026, is 13 amended to read as follows: 14 1. An interior design examining board is established within 15 the department. The board consists of seven members: five 16 members who are interior designers who are registered under 17 this chapter and who have been in the active practice of 18 registered interior design for not less than five years, the 19 last two of which shall have been in Iowa; and two members who 20 are not registered under this chapter and who shall represent 21 the general public. Members shall be appointed by the governor 22 subject to confirmation by the senate. 23 Sec. 168. Section 544C.2, subsections 2 and 3, Code 2026, 24 are amended by striking the subsections. 25 Sec. 169. Section 544C.3, subsection 1, paragraphs e and f, 26 Code 2026, are amended by striking the paragraphs. 27 Sec. 170. Section 544C.3, subsection 2, Code 2026, is 28 amended by striking the subsection. 29 Sec. 171. Section 710A.3, Code 2026, is amended to read as 30 follows: 31 710A.3 Affirmative defense. 32 It shall be an affirmative defense, in addition to any other 33 affirmative defenses for which a defendant may be eligible, 34 to a prosecution for a criminal violation of section 152C.5B , 35 -53- LSB 5537HV (3) 91 ss/ko 53/ 62 H.F. 2666 152C.5C , 157.4A , 157.4B , 710A.2 , 710A.2A , or 710A.2B , that the 1 violation directly resulted from the defendantâs status as a 2 victim of any human trafficking crime under chapter 710A . 3 Sec. 172. REPEAL. Sections 148.2B, 148.7, 148.8, 148.8A, 4 148.9, 148.10, 148.12, 148.14, 148C.13, 149.7, 151.12, 152.2, 5 152.9, 152.11, 152D.9, 153.19, 154B.8, 155.14, 155.19, 155A.5, 6 155A.39, 157.7, 542B.4, 542B.6, 542B.7, 542B.8, 542B.9, 7 542B.12, 542B.13, 542B.17, 542B.18, 542B.19, 542B.22, 542B.24, 8 542B.30, 542B.31, 542B.32, 543D.6,543D.7, 543D.14, 544A.2, 9 544A.3, 544A.9, 544A.10, 544A.11, 544A.12, 544A.20, 544A.25, 10 544A.26, 544A.27, 544B.4, 544B.7, 544B.10, 544B.11, 544B.13, 11 544B.14, 544B.15, 544B.16, 544B.17, 544B.18, 544B.19, 544C.4, 12 544C.6, 544C.7, 544C.9, and 544C.11, Code 2026, are repealed. 13 Sec. 173. APPLICABILITY. 14 1. The following apply to licenses issued pursuant to 15 chapter 103 on or after the effective date of this Act and on or 16 after the date on which the department of inspections, appeals, 17 and licensing adopts rules setting the term and renewal 18 procedures for licenses issued pursuant to chapter 103: 19 a. The section of this Act amending section 103.18. 20 b. The section of this Act amending section 103.19, 21 subsections 1 and 2. 22 2. The following applies to licenses issued pursuant to 23 chapter 105 on or after the effective date of this Act and 24 on or after the date on which the department of inspections, 25 appeals, and licensing adopts rules setting the term and 26 renewal procedures for licenses issued pursuant to chapter 105: 27 the section of this Act amending section 105.20, subsection 1. 28 3. The following applies to licenses issued pursuant to 29 chapter 147 on or after the effective date of this Act and 30 on or after the date on which the department of inspections, 31 appeals, and licensing adopts rules setting the term and 32 renewal procedures for licenses issued pursuant to chapter 147: 33 the section of this Act amending section 147.10. 34 4. The following apply to licenses issued pursuant to 35 -54- LSB 5537HV (3) 91 ss/ko 54/ 62 H.F. 2666 chapter 157 on or after the effective date of this Act and on or 1 after the date on which the department of inspections, appeals, 2 and licensing adopts rules setting the term and renewal 3 procedures for licenses issued pursuant to chapter 157: 4 a. The sections of this Act amending section 157.8. 5 b. The section of this Act amending section 157.11. 6 5. The following applies to licenses issued pursuant to 7 chapter 542 on or after the effective date of this Act and 8 on or after the date on which the department of inspections, 9 appeals, and licensing adopts rules setting the term and 10 renewal procedures for licenses issued pursuant to chapter 542: 11 the sections of this Act amending section 542.7. 12